Massachusetts, session 194th, S633.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 22 the
following section:-
Section XX. “In conjunction with the Snowmobile Association of Massachusetts, or its
successor organization, a three-day “free snowmobile weekend” shall be established annually by
the Massachusetts Office of Law Enforcement on a mutually agreeable weekend during the
winter snowmobiling season. For the purposes of this section a “free snowmobile weekend” is
defined as Friday, Saturday, Sunday during which Massachusetts snowmobile registration and
Trail Pass provided by the Snowmobile Association of Massachusetts or its appendant clubs is
not required for non-residents to operate snowmobiles on public lands, or private lands under
of 2

agreement with the Snowmobile Association of Massachusetts or its appendant clubs, provided
said non-resident has proof of a valid registration in any state or Canadian province”.
of 2